Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. In General
§ 26-3-118.
Suspension, revocation of certification of authority; duration of suspension; reinstatement.

Suspension of an insurer’s certificate of authority shall be for the period the commissioner specifies in the order of suspension, but not to exceed one (1) year. During the suspension period the commissioner may rescind or shorten the suspension by further order.

During the suspension period the insurer shall not solicit or write any new business in this state but shall file its annual statement, pay fees, licenses and taxes as required under this code [title 26] and may service its business already in force in this state as if the certificate of authority had continued in full force.

Upon expiration of the suspension period, if within that period the certificate of authority has not terminated, the insurer’s certificate of authority is automatically reinstated unless the commissioner finds that the causes of the suspension, other than a discontinued violation, have not terminated, or that the insurer is otherwise not in compliance with the requirements of this code, and of which the commissioner shall give the insurer notice not less than thirty (30) days in advance of expiration of the suspension period. If not automatically reinstated, the certificate of authority terminates at the end of the suspension period.

Upon reinstatement of the insurer’s certificate of authority, the authority of its agents in this state to represent the insurer also reinstate. The commissioner shall promptly notify the insurer and its agents in this state, of record in the department, of reinstatement. If pursuant to W.S. 26-3-117(c) the commissioner has published notice of suspension of the insurer’s certificate of authority, he shall also publish notice of reinstatement.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 67; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-67; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-122

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-3-119.
General corporation laws not applicable to authorized foreign insurers.

The general corporation laws of this state do not apply to foreign insurers holding certificates of authority to transact insurance in this state.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 73, § 40; 1886, ch. 76, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 641; Laws 1890-91, ch. 42, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 3192; C.S. 1910, § 4139; C.S. 1920, § 5284; R.S. 1931, § 57-439; C.S. 1945, § 52-1040; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-6, 26.1-68; Laws 1965, ch. 142, § 1; 1967, ch. 136, § 68; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-123

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions relating to corporations generally, see title 17.

§ 26-3-120.
Property insurance under 1 additional title authorized.

A property insurer or multiple line insurer authorized to transact insurance in Wyoming may issue property insurance policies under its own name or under one (1) additional “title” registered with the commissioner.

Upon request the commissioner shall furnish to the insurer the form required for registration, and the insurer shall pay the registration fee specified in W.S.

26-4-101

. The registered title shall be shown on the insurer’s certificate of authority and shall remain in effect as long as the insurer’s certificate of authority is in effect, subject to earlier termination at the insurer’s request.

The insurer may separately appoint agents in this state under the registered title in the same manner and on payment of the same fees as apply to appointment and continuation of agents by property insurers in general.

All business transacted by the insurer under the title shall be included in business and transactions of the insurer to be shown by its annual statement and for all purposes under this code [title 26].

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 69; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-69; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-124

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-3-121.
Service of process; commissioner as agent for service.

Before the commissioner issues a certificate of authority to any foreign, alien or domestic reciprocal insurer, each insurer shall appoint the commissioner, and his successors in office, as its attorney to receive service of legal process issued against the insurer in this state. The appointment shall be made on a form as designated and furnished by the commissioner and shall be accompanied by a copy of a resolution of the insurer’s governing body, if an incorporated insurer, showing that the officers who executed the appointment were authorized to do so on the insurer’s behalf.

The appointment is irrevocable, binds the insurer and any successor in interest as to the insurer’s assets or liabilities and remains in effect as long as there is in force any contract of the insurer in this state or any obligation of the insurer arising out of its transactions in this state.

Service of process against a foreign or alien insurer shall be made only by service thereof upon the commissioner.

At time of application for a certificate of authority the insurer shall file the appointment with the commissioner, together with a designation of the person to whom process against it served upon the commissioner is to be forwarded. The insurer may change that designation by a new filing.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 125, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-63, 26.1-70; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 70; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-125

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to service of process generally, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Intent of legislature. —

In passing this section, the legislature was interested in the furnishing of a local forum for residents of this state and for nonresidents when the cause of action arises in this state. Lohman v. Jefferson Standard Life Ins. Co., 525 P.2d 1,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 1974).

No jurisdiction where cause of action arose outside state and plaintiff is nonresident. —

Section

1-5-107

and this section, absent unjustified judicial enlargement, provide for no jurisdiction in Wyoming courts over nonresidents of the state where there is a nonresident plaintiff and the cause of action arises and all contacts have been outside the state. Lohman v. Jefferson Standard Life Ins. Co., 525 P.2d 1,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 1974).

There is nothing in subsection (c) standing alone which authorizes service upon an insurer where the cause of action arose elsewhere than Wyoming and the plaintiff is a nonresident of this state. Lohman v. Jefferson Standard Life Ins. Co., 525 P.2d 1,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 224

(Wyo. 1974).

Cited

in

Gookin v. State Farm Fire & Cas. Ins. Co., 826 P.2d 229,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 26-3-122.
Service of process; service generally.

Service of process against an insurer for whom the commissioner is attorney shall be made by delivering to and leaving with the commissioner, his deputy or a person in apparent charge of his office during the commissioner’s absence, two (2) copies of the process together with a fee as provided in W.S.

26-4-101

, taxable as costs in the action.

In case the process is issued by an inferior court, it may be directed to and served in duplicate by an officer authorized to serve process in the city or county of the commissioner’s office, at least fifteen (15) days before the return day thereof, and that service confers jurisdiction.

Upon service the commissioner shall immediately mail by registered mail one (1) of the copies of the process to the person currently designated by the insurer to receive the process as provided in W.S. 26-3-121(d).

Service of process is sufficient if:

Notice of that service and a copy of the process are sent within ten (10) days from the date of service by registered mail by plaintiff or his attorney to the defendant insurer at its last known principal place of business in the United States;

The defendant receives or the post office with which the letter is registered issues a receipt, showing the name of the sender of the letter and the name and address of the person to whom the letter is addressed; and

The affidavit of the plaintiff or his attorney showing compliance with this section are filed with the clerk of the court in which the action is pending, on or before the date the defendant is required to appear, or within such further time as the court allows.

The commissioner shall keep a record of the day of service upon him of all legal process.

Process served upon the commissioner with a copy forwarded as in this section provided constitutes valid and binding personal service upon the insurer.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 125, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-63, 26.1-71; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 71; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-126

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2000, ch. 19, § 1; ch. 30, § 1; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “an” for
“a justice of the piece or other” following”
issued by.”

Cross references. —

As to service of process on nonresident insurance producers, see §

26-9-230

.

As to service of process against surplus line insurer, see §

26-11-120

.

As to service of process on unauthorized insurers, see §§

26-12-202

through

26-12-204

.

As to service of process upon unauthorized insurers regarding trade practices and frauds, see §

26-13-117

.

As to service of process on reciprocal insurers, see §

26-27-114

.

As to service of process on fraternal benefit societies, see §

26-29-235

.

As to service of process generally, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

Duty to defend claim. —

The duty of an insurer to defend a claim is broader than the duty of the insurer to indemnify. Hutchinson Oil Co. v. Federated Serv. Ins. Co., 851 F. Supp. 1546, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6644 (D. Wyo. 1994).

To determine the duty of the insurer to defend the insured, the terms of the policy and the allegations in the complaint must be examined. Hutchinson Oil Co. v. Federated Serv. Ins. Co., 851 F. Supp. 1546, 1994 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6644 (D. Wyo. 1994).

Service on commissioner without sending separate notice to insurer inadequate. —

Personal service under this section must be accomplished by serving the insurance commissioner and providing a notice of service with a copy of the service to the insurer. One or the other is simply insufficient to satisfy due process. Gookin v. State Farm Fire & Casualty Ins. Co., 826 P.2d 229,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1992).

Service invalid where server not appointed by clerk. —

Service of process was without legal effect where the plaintiff used a private investigator not specifically appointed by the clerk of the court to deliver the complaint. Gookin v. State Farm Fire & Casualty Ins. Co., 826 P.2d 229,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1992).

Thirty-day time limit for answer. —

Under this section, a defendant shall serve his answer within 30 days after service of the summons and complaint on the insurance commissioner. Gookin v. State Farm Fire & Casualty Ins. Co., 826 P.2d 229,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1992).

Stated

in

Midway Oil Corp. v. Guess, 714 P.2d 339,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

In Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of substituted service of process upon liability insurer of unavailable tortfeasor, 17 ALR4th 918.

§ 26-3-123.
Annual and quarterly statement; required; form; verification; failure to file.

Each authorized insurer, annually, on or before March 1, or within any extended time the commissioner grants, not to exceed thirty (30) days, shall file with the commissioner a full and true statement of its financial condition, transactions and affairs as of December 31 immediately preceding. The statement shall be in the general form and context of, and require information as called for by, the form of annual statement as currently in general and customary use in the United States for the type of insurer and kinds of insurance to be reported upon, with any modification the commissioner requires. The statement shall be verified by the oath of the insurer’s president or vice-president and secretary or actuary as applicable, or if a reciprocal insurer by the oath of the attorney-in-fact, or its like officers if a corporation.

Each authorized insurer shall file with the commissioner on a quarterly basis a statement of its financial condition for the preceding quarter. The statement shall be in the form of a quarterly statement as currently in general and customary use in the United States for the type of insurer and kinds of insurance to be reported upon, with any modification the commissioner requires. Each quarterly statement shall be filed with the commissioner on or before forty-five (45) days from the end of the quarter being reported.

The statement of an alien insurer shall be verified by its United States manager or other authorized officer and shall relate only to the insurer’s transactions and affairs in the United States unless the commissioner requires otherwise. If the commissioner requires a statement as to an alien insurer’s affairs throughout the world, the insurer shall file the statement with the commissioner as soon as reasonably possible.

All annual and quarterly statements filed pursuant to this section shall be completed pursuant to the most recent National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ accounting practices and procedures manual and accompanied by an electronic version containing the same information as the statement. The commissioner may specify the format of the electronic version. The commissioner may accept, for any foreign insurer required to file any statement under this section, an electronic filing with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners meeting the requirements of this section as a filing with the commissioner. The commissioner may refuse to continue or may suspend or revoke the certificate of authority of any insurer failing to file its annual or quarterly statement when due.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 64, § 20; R.S. 1887, § 622; R.S. 1899, § 3174; Laws 1907, ch. 98, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4120; C.S. 1920, § 5264; R.S. 1931, § 57-422; C.S. 1945, § 52-1022; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-36, 26.1-72; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 72; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-127

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1994, ch. 76, § 2; 2001, ch. 9, § 1; 2004, ch. 14, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (d), substituted “electronic version” for “computer diskette” and “format” for “size and format,” and inserted the penultimate sentence.

Cross references. —

As to annual report of fraternal benefit societies, see §

26-29-226

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Tort Reform and the Medical Malpractice Insurance Crisis: A Second Opinion,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 593 (1993).

§ 26-3-124.
Annual statement; mandatory reporting of claims against health care providers; confidentiality; abstract of statistics.

Any insurer writing coverage for health care malpractice in this state, by March 1 of each year, shall file with the commissioner a report of all claims against a health care provider and a report of all awards or settlements given in cases against health care providers. The report shall contain the following information only for the preceding calendar year:

The number and categories of all health care providers the company insures for professional liability;

The number of claims for which a reserve has been established made against covered health care providers, including those claims in which no suit was filed;

The awards and settlements on health care professional liability claims, including the costs of defense;

For each claim:

Specialty coverage of the insured;

Nature and substance of the claim;

Age of the claimant or plaintiff;

After final disposition of the claim, the date and manner of disposition, whether by judgment, settlement, arbitration or otherwise, and an itemization of the amounts paid, if any, if reported separately or can be reasonably segregated or identified for:

Medical and prescription costs;

Economic damages;

Noneconomic damages;

Defense attorneys fees, costs and expenses.

Any additional information required by the commissioner.

Any information provided the commissioner pursuant to this section shall be confidential including the names of health care providers and any records pertaining thereto. The commissioner shall prepare a summary of such information, in the aggregate if necessary to protect the identity of the health care provider or claimant, for inclusion in his annual report to the governor pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1014

.

The commissioner may adopt rules, regulations and reporting forms necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 13, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-72.1; W.S. 1977, § 26-3-128; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 2005, ch. 196, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted (a)(iv); rewrote (b) regarding the information provided the commissioner; and added (c).

§ 26-3-125.
Annual statement; mandatory reporting of claims against governmental entity.

On or before March 15 of each year, each insurer providing insurance to a governmental entity, as defined in W.S. 1-39-103(a)(i), shall file with the commissioner of insurance a report of the claims made against its insureds which have been closed during the immediately preceding calendar year. The report shall contain, but is not limited to, the following information:

The total number of claims filed, broken down by category or type of claim;

The total amount paid in settlement or discharge of the claims for each type or category of claims;

The total amount of premiums received from insureds under this act [title 26];

The total number of insureds under this act whose liability insurance the insurer cancelled or refused to renew and the reasons therefor.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 157, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-72.1; W.S. 1977, § 26-3-128.1; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming's Governmental Claims Act: Sovereign Immunity with Exceptions — A Statutory Analysis,” see 15 Land & Water L. Rev. 619 (1980).

§ 26-3-126.
Annual statement; correction and publication of statements.

As soon as reasonably possible after the insurer files its annual statement with the commissioner, the commissioner shall review the statement and require correction of any errors or omissions.

After any corrections noted are made, the commissioner shall:

Cause each statement filed to be condensed and summarized showing briefly but intelligibly the capital, assets, liabilities, income, expenditures and business each insurer does within this state;

Include in the summary his certificate, if true, that to the best of his knowledge and belief the insurer is in all respects in compliance with the insurance laws of this state;

Cause each summary and certificate to be directly accessible to the public via a link from the main page of the official department website.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 135 § 2.

The commissioner shall cause to be published no less than six (6) times per year and no more than twelve (12) times per year, in newspapers of general circulation within the state that meet the requirements of legal newspapers pursuant to W.S.

18-3-519

, a public service announcement pertaining to insurance which shall include a description of how citizens may access information about licensed insurance companies on the official department website. The cost of the publications shall be shared equally among all insurers required to file an annual statement pursuant to W.S.

26-3-123

and each insurer shall pay its share of the cost of publication upon receipt of a statement from the department. The department shall report to the joint corporations, elections and political subdivisions interim committee on or before July 1, 2015 concerning any public response to the public service announcements required by this subsection.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 64, § 20; R.S. 1887, § 622; R.S. 1899, § 3174; Laws 1907, ch. 98, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 4120; C.S. 1920, § 5264; R.S. 1931, § 57-422; C.S. 1945, § 52-1022; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-36, 26.1-73; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 73; W.S. 1977, § 26-3-129; Laws 1983, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2; ch. 190, § 1; 2013 ch. 135, §§ 1, 2, effective March 13, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

rewrote (b)(iii), which read: “Cause each summary and certificate to be published for six (6) successive days in a daily newspaper of general circulation within the state, or for six (6) successive weeks in a weekly newspaper of general circulation, and the insurer shall pay the cost of publication upon receipt of a statement from the newspaper”; deleted former (c), which read: “Insofar as is possible the commissioner shall distribute the publications equally among the newspapers located in this state”; and added (d).

Laws 2013, ch. 135, § 3, made the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2013.

§§ 26-3-127 through 26-3-129.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 19, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 136, §§ 74 to 76, related to countersigning agents.

§ 26-3-130.
Retaliatory provisions against other states and countries.

The commissioner shall impose upon any insurer, or upon the agent or representative of that insurer of any other state or any foreign country doing business in Wyoming the same taxes, licenses and other fees, in the aggregate, and the same fines, penalties, deposit requirements or other material requirements, obligations, prohibitions or restrictions as are imposed upon Wyoming insurers, or upon their agents or representatives, by the laws of any other state or any political subdivision thereof, or any country or any province or other political subdivision thereof.

This section does not apply to:

Application fees, examination fees, license fees, appointment fees and continuation fees for agents, adjusters or consultants;

Personal income taxes, ad valorem taxes on real or personal property nor to special purpose obligations or assessments imposed by another state in connection with particular kinds of insurance other than property insurance, except that the commissioner shall consider deductions, from premium taxes or other taxes otherwise payable, allowed because of real estate or personal property taxes paid in determining the propriety and extent of retaliatory action under this section; or

Life insurance premium taxes on that portion of a life insurance policy’s annual premium exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00).

For the purposes of this section:

The domicile of an alien insurer, other than insurers formed under the laws of Canada, or a province thereof, is that state the insurer designates in writing and files with the commissioner at time of admission to this state and may be that state in which:

The insurer is first authorized to transact insurance;

Is located the insurer’s principal place of business in the United States; or

Is held the insurer’s largest deposit of trusteed assets for the protection of its policyholders in the United States.

The domicile of an insurer formed under the laws of Canada or a province thereof is that province in which its head office is located.

If the insurer does not make a designation as provided in subsection (c) of this section, its domicile is that state in which is located its principal place of business in the United States.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 77; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-77; W.S. 1977, §

26-3-133

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1987, ch. 170, § 1; 2011, ch. 60, § 2; 2020 ch. 136, § 1, effective January 1, 2021.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b)(i), deleted “service representatives” after “adjusters.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added (b)(iii) and made related changes.

§ 26-3-131.
Disclosure of loss information; penalties.

Any insurer writing property or casualty insurance in this state as defined in W.S.

26-5-104

and

26-5-106

, shall provide the following information to the named insured within thirty (30) days of receipt of the insured’s written request, but in no event more frequently than once in any twelve (12) month period:

Information on claims involving the insured closed within the preceding two (2) years limited to the date and description of occurrence and amount of payments, if any;

Information on open claims involving the insured limited to the date and description of occurrence, amount of claim and amount of payment, if any;

Information on notices of occurrence involving the insured limited to the date and description of occurrence and amount of claim; and

The total amount of reserve on open claims provided no insurer shall be required to provide information on any reserve specifically applicable to or identifying any claim which is or may become subject to proceedings before state or federal courts.

An insurer which elects to cancel or nonrenew any policy of insurance subject to this section, for any reason other than nonpayment of premium, shall cause to be delivered to the insured, at the time such notice of cancellation or nonrenewal is given, a brief statement advising the insured of his right to request the information required to be given under this section.

Any insurer who violates this section is subject to monetary penalties or license revocation or suspension as provided by W.S.

26-1-107

and

26-3-116

.

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 3.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 56, § 1; 2004, ch. 57, § 3.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, repealed (d) which formerly read: “This section does not apply to home owner's property insurance.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 4 provides: “The insurance commissioner may begin the promulgation of rules implementing the provisions of this act upon the effective date of this section.”

Laws 2004, ch. 57, § 6(a), makes § 4 effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

§ 26-3-132.
Commissioner's authority.

For the purposes of making a determination of an insurer’s financial condition under this code, the commissioner may:

Disregard any credit or amount receivable resulting from transactions with a reinsurer which is insolvent, impaired or otherwise subject to a delinquency proceeding;

Make appropriate adjustments, including disallowance, to asset values attributable to investments in or transactions with an insurer’s parent company, subsidiaries or affiliates consistent with the NAIC Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual, state laws and regulations;

Refuse to recognize the stated value of accounts receivable if the ability to collect receivables is highly speculative in view of the age of the account or the financial condition of the debtor;

Increase the insurer’s liability in an amount equal to any contingent liability, pledge or guarantee not otherwise included if there is a substantial risk that the insurer will be called upon to meet the obligation undertaken within the next twelve (12) month period.

If the commissioner determines that the continued operation of the insurer licensed to transact business in this state may be hazardous or injurious to its policyholders, creditors or the general public, then the commissioner may, in addition to any other action permitted by this code, issue an order requiring the insurer to:

Reduce the total amount of present and potential liability for policy benefits by purchasing reinsurance;

Reduce, suspend or limit the volume of business being accepted or renewed;

Reduce general insurance expenses and commission expenses by specified methods;

Increase the insurer’s capital and surplus;

Suspend or limit the declaration and payment of dividends by an insurer to its stockholders or to its policyholders;

File reports in a form acceptable to the commissioner concerning the market value of an insurer’s assets;

Limit or withdraw from specified investments or discontinue specified investment practices to the extent the commissioner deems necessary;

Document the adequacy of premium rates in relation to the risks insured;

File, in addition to regular annual statements, interim financial reports in the form adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or in a format promulgated by the commissioner;

Correct corporate governance practice deficiencies and adopt and utilize governance practices acceptable to the commissioner;

Provide a business plan to the commissioner in order to continue to transact business in the state;

Notwithstanding W.S.

26-14-102

,

26-19-304

,

26-21-109

,

26-23-326

and

26-34-109

, adjust rates for any nonlife insurance product written by the insurer that the commissioner considers necessary to improve the financial condition of the insurer.

Any insurer subject to an order under subsection (b) of this section may request a hearing to review that order as provided in W.S.

26-2-125

. The notice of hearing shall be served upon the insurer pursuant to W.S.

26-2-126

. The notice of hearing shall state the time and place of hearing and the conduct, condition or grounds upon which the commissioner based the order. Unless mutually agreed between the commissioner and the insurer, the hearing shall occur not less than ten (10) days nor more than thirty (30) days after notice is served and shall be either in Laramie County or in some other place convenient to the parties designated by the commissioner. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commissioner shall hold all hearings under this subsection privately, unless the insurer requests a public hearing, in which case the hearing shall be public.

This section shall not be construed to limit the powers granted the commissioner by any other laws of this state.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 59, § 1; 2012, ch. 38, § 2.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(ii), added “including disallowance,” and added “consistent with the NAIC Accounting Practices and Procedures Manual, state laws and regulations”; substituted “its policyholders, creditors” for “the policyholders” in the introductory language of (b); added (b)(x) through (xii); and added the present second through fourth sentences in (c).

Meaning of “this code.” —

For the definition of “this code,” referred to in this section, see § 26-1-102(a)(xxxii).

§ 26-3-133.
Judicial review.

Any order or decision of the commissioner pursuant to this title shall be subject to review in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, W.S.

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

, at the instance of any party to the proceedings whose interests are substantially affected.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 38, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 38, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2012.